Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-689
Permitholder; subject to control area regulations.

Nothing in the Industrial Ground Water Regulatory Act shall be construed to exempt the holder of a permit issued pursuant to section 46-683 from any regulations adopted by a natural resources district pursuant to the Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act for a control area designated before such permit has been granted.

Laws 1981, LB 56, § 15;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 75.

Nebraska Ground Water Management and Protection Act, see section 46-701.